Hawaii statutes.
§109-3 Stadium special fund. There is
created a special fund to be known as the stadium special fund into which funds
collected by the authority shall be deposited. The stadium special fund shall
be applied, used, and disposed of for the payment of:

(1) The expenses of the operation, maintenance,
promotion, and management of; and

(2) All or a portion of the cost of financing any
capital improvement project for;

the stadium and related facilities; provided that
all services required for the stadium and related facilities shall be performed
by persons hired on contract or otherwise, without regard for chapter 76;
provided further that the authority shall report to the legislature all
receipts and expenditures of the stadium special fund account twenty days prior
to the convening of each regular session. [L 1970, c 172, §3; am L 1971, c 125,
pt of §1 and c 173, §4; am L 1975, c 172, §2; am L 1993, c 280, §7; am L 1995,
c 149, §2; am L 1999, c 160, §9; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2016, c 61, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next